Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 458.650 is amended to read:
458.650. (1) The Housing and Community  Services Department shall administer the Emergency
Housing Account to assist homeless  individuals and individuals who are at risk of becoming
homeless, through  means including the emergency housing assistance program and the state
homeless assistance program.  Notwithstanding subsection (3)(a) of this section, the state homeless
assistance program shall serve individuals experiencing homelessness, especially  unsheltered
homelessness, without respect to income.
(2) The [ Oregon Housing Stability Council ] department  shall develop  a policy for the use of
program [ funds] moneys  with the advice of:
(a) Persons who have experienced housing instability;
(b) Tribes;
(c) The Community Action Partnership of Oregon;
(d) Continuums of care, as defined in 24 C.F.R. part 578;
(e) Local governments;
(f) Nonprofit organizations;
(g) Homeless services providers;
(h) Culturally specific organizations;
(i) Housing providers;
(j) Veterans’ services organizations;
(k) The Oregon Housing Stability Council; and
[(k)] (L)  Other entities identified by the department by rule.
(3) The policy under subsection  (2) of this section shall direct that program funds [ shall] must
be used:
(a) To provide to low and very low income individuals, including but  not limited to individuals
more than 65 years of age, persons with disabilities, agricultural workers and Native Americans:
(A) Emergency shelters and attendant services;
(B) Transitional housing services designed to assist individuals to make the  transition from
homelessness to permanent housing and economic independence;
(C) Supportive  housing services to enable individuals to continue living in their own homes or
to provide in-home services for such individuals for whom suitable programs do not exist in  their
geographic area;
Enrolled House Bill 3034 (HB 3034-INTRO) Page 1
(D) Programs that provide emergency payment of home payments, rents or utilities;
(E) Support for individuals with companion animals, as defined in ORS 401.977, that includes:
(i) Food for both companion animals and their owners;
(ii) Crates or kennels on-site or  off-site that are easily accessible to the companion animal
owners;
(iii) Basic veterinary services, including behavioral services; and
(iv) Rules of conduct and responsibility regarding companion animals and their owners; or
(F) Some or all of the services or assistance described in subparagraphs (A) to (E) of this para-
graph.
(b) To provide the services and  assistance described in paragraph (a) of this subsection to
school-aged children enrolled in kindergarten through grade 12, or to  their families, who are
homeless or at risk of becoming homeless.
(c) To align with federal strategies and resources that are available to  prevent and end
homelessness, including the requirement of providing culturally responsive services  and using
evidence-based and emerging practices  effective in ending homelessness, including practices unique
to rural communities.
(4)(a) The [ council shall require as a condition of awarding  a grant that the organization demon-
strate to the satisfaction of the ] department may not  award a grant under this section unless the
organization demonstrates that the organization:
(A) Has the capacity to deliver any service proposed by the organization;
(B) Is a culturally  responsive organization or is engaged in a process to become a culturally
responsive organization;
(C) Engages with culturally specific organizations; and
(D) Supports local homelessness system planning efforts.
(b) Any funds granted under this section may not be used to replace existing funds. Funds
granted under this section may be used to supplement  existing funds. An organization may use funds
to support existing programs or to establish new programs.
(5) The department may expend funds from the account for:
(a) The administration of the account as provided for in the  legislatively approved budget, as
that term is defined in ORS 291.002, for the department in  support of directing a statewide policy
on homelessness that ensures use of evidence-based  and emerging practices, service equity in fund-
ing and local planning processes.
(b) The development of technical assistance and training resources  for organizations developing
and operating emergency shelters as defined in ORS 197.782 and transitional housing  accommo-
dations as described in ORS 197.746.
(6) The department shall utilize outcome-oriented contracting processes and  evidence-based and
emerging practices for account  program funds, including evidence-based and emerging practices for
serving rural communities.
(7) [Twenty-five percent of  moneys deposited in the account pursuant to ORS 294.187 are dedicated
to the emergency housing assistance program ] Of moneys  deposited in the account pursuant to
ORS 294.187 (2)(b)(B), 25 percent are dedicated for assistance to veterans  who are homeless or
at risk of becoming homeless.
Enrolled House Bill 3034 (HB 3034-INTRO) Page 2
Passed by House February 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 30, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3034 (HB 3034-INTRO) Page 3